apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="cusì__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bellu__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="facilment/e__adv">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a.C.__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sempr/i__adv">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- SECTION: Preadverbs (adv modifying other adverbs)-->
    <pardef n="assai__preadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="S__stat/u">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__ponesi/la">
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__finisce/li">
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>nne</l><r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ponesi/la"/></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__parla/lli">
      <e><p><l>lli</l><r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lla</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lle</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cci</l><r>ci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nne</l><r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cci</l><r>ci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ssi</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ssi</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ponesi/la"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ponesi/la"/></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vvi</l><r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="micca"><i>micca</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="digià"><i>digià</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inseme"><i>inseme</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="in faccia"><i>in<b/>faccia</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eccetera"><i>eccetera</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ormai"><i>ormai</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="troppu"><i>troppu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sopratuttu"><i>sopratuttu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
<e lm="a siconda"><i>a<b/>siconda</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="insemu"><i>insemu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cusì"><i>cusì</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="quantunque"><i>quantunque</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="custì"><i>custì</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="avà"><i>avà</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="d'altronde"><i>d'altronde</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="d'apressu"><i>d'apressu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bè"><i>bè</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bè" r="LR"><p><l>bene</l><r>bè</r></p><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="oghje"><i>oghje</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inoltri"><i>inoltri</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="appinuccia"><i>appinuccia</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="assai"><i>assai</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="quà"><i>quà</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="quì"><i>quì</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="menu"><i>menu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dighjà"><i>dighjà</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ghjà"><i>ghjà</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ancora"><i>ancora</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="quì"><i>quì</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="à dossu"><i>à<b/>dossu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="forse"><i>forse</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="più"><i>più</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ancu"><i>ancu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="annantu"><i>annantu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="spessu"><i>spessu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sempri"><i>sempr</i><par n="sempr/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="difatti"><i>difatti</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="solu"><i>solu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tandu"><i>tandu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sinu a"><i>sinu<b/>a</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="appena"><i>appena</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="caud"><i>caud</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="freddo"><i>freddo</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="subitu"><i>subitu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="abbastanza"><i>abbastanza</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inoltre"><i>inoltre</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dinù"><i>dinù</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="moltu"><i>moltu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tantu"><i>tantu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="almenu"><i>almenu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inveci"><i>inveci</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mai"><i>mai</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mori"><i>mori</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prestu"><i>prestu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cà"><i>cà</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="purtantu"><i>purtantu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pronti"><i>pronti</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cumplettamente"><i>cumplettament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cuncretamente"><i>cuncretament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="disgraziatamente"><i>disgraziatament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="francamente"><i>francament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pienamente"><i>pienament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="precisamente"><i>precisament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="puliticamente"><i>puliticament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sclusivamente"><i>sclusivament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="semplicemente"><i>semplicement</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sempliciamente" r="LR"><p><l>sempliciament</l><r>semplicement</r></p><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sempliciamente" r="LR"><p><l>simplicement</l><r>semplicement</r></p><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="siguramente"><i>sigurament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="simplicemente"><i>simplicement</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="strutturalmente"><i>strutturalment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="veramente"><i>verament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ampiamente"><i>ampiament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="veramente"><i>verament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prisumibilamente"><i>prisumibilament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="attualmente"><i>attualment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cumunemente"><i>cumunement</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cuntemporaneamente"><i>cuntemporaneament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="definitivamente"><i>definitivament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="direttamente"><i>direttament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="direttamente" r="LR"><p><l>dirittament</l><r>direttament</r></p><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="esattamente"><i>esattament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="essenzialmente"><i>essenzialment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="estremamente"><i>estremament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="etimologicamente"><i>etimologicament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="facilmente"><i>facilment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="finalmente"><i>finalment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ghjeneralmente"><i>ghjeneralment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inizialmente"><i>inizialment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="notevolmente"><i>notevolment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="novamente"><i>novament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="particularmente"><i>particularment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="principalmente"><i>principalment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prubabilmente"><i>prubabilment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rapidamente"><i>rapidament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="raramente"><i>rarament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="recentemente"><i>recentement</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rispettivamente"><i>rispettivament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="solamente"><i>solament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="specialmente"><i>specialment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="storicamente"><i>storicament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ufficialmente"><i>ufficialment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tipicamente"><i>tipicament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="simpliciamente"><i>simpliciament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ufficialamente"><i>ufficialament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="parzialamente"><i>parzialament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="principalamente"><i>principalament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="littiralamente"><i>littiralament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="faciulamente"><i>faciulament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nutevulamente"><i>nutevulament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="particularamente"><i>particularament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="immediatamente"><i>immediatament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cumplittamente"><i>cumplittament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rilativamente"><i>rilativament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rispittivamente"><i>rispittivament</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="probbiu"><i>probbiu</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="non"><i>non</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="circa"><i>circa</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="a.C."><i>a.C.</i><par n="a.C.__adv"/></e>
